Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1630
Bonds; approval by district court; hearing; notice.

The court shall fix the time for the hearing of the petition, and shall order the clerk of the court to give and publish a notice of the filing of the petition. The notice shall be given as is provided by subsection (1) of section 39-1604, unless other or different notice is fixed by the court. The notice shall state the time and place fixed for the hearing of the petition, the prayer of the petition, and that any person interested in the organization of the district, or in the proceedings for the issuance of the bonds, may, on or before the day fixed for the hearing of the petition, move to dismiss the petition or answer thereto. The petition may be referred to and described in the notice as the petition of ....................... (giving its name) praying that the proceedings for the issuance of such bonds of such district may be examined, approved, and confirmed by the court.

Laws 1957, c. 155, art. III, § 30, p. 537;

Laws 1959, c. 167, § 6, p. 611.